Vermont, session 2025-2026, H803.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. chapter 13 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 13. APPRENTICESHIP
§ 1111. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(22) “Nontraditional apprenticeship population” means a group of
individuals who have historically been excluded from various occupations,
such as individuals from the same gender, race, or ethnicity, the members of
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 2 of 10
which comprise fewer than 25 percent of the program participants in an
apprenticeable occupation.
(23) “Nontraditional apprenticeship industry or occupation” refers to an
industry sector or occupation that represents fewer than 10 ten percent of
apprenticeable occupations or the programs under the national apprenticeship
system, using the calendar year 2023 as the benchmark.
* * *
(33) “Underserved communities” means the populations sharing a
particular characteristic, as well as geographic communities, who have been
systematically denied a full opportunity to participate in aspects of economic,
social, and civic life. This term includes individuals who belong to
communities of color, such as Black and African American, Hispanic and
Latino, Native American, Alaskan Native and Indigenous, Asian American,
Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander, Middle Eastern, and North African
persons. It also includes individuals who belong to communities that face
discrimination based on sex, sexual orientation, and gender identity, including
lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, gender non-conforming, and non-
binary (LGBTQ+ persons); persons who face discrimination based on
pregnancy or pregnancy-related conditions; parents; and caregivers. It also
includes individuals who belong to communities that face discrimination based
on their religion and disability; first-generation professionals or first-
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 3 of 10
generation college students; individuals with limited English proficiency;
immigrants; individuals who belong to communities that may face employment
barriers based on older age or former incarceration; persons who live in rural
areas; veterans and military spouses; and persons otherwise adversely affected
by persistent poverty, discrimination, or inequality:
(A) face employment barriers based on age or former incarceration;
(B) live in rural areas;
(C) lack access to transportation options or high-speed internet;
(D) are veterans or spouses of veterans; and
(E) are otherwise adversely affected by poverty, discrimination, or
inequality. Individuals may belong to more than one underserved community
and face intersecting barriers.
* * *
§ 1113. VERMONT REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAM
* * *
(e) Strategic planning and reporting. The Vermont Registered
Apprenticeship Program shall:
(1) develop and disseminate a strategic plan once every five years,
beginning on July 1, 2024 2026, which shall include information on how the
Program will implement the requirements of this chapter;
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 4 of 10
(2) prepare and submit to the Vermont General Assembly an annual
report on the status of the Vermont Registered Apprenticeship Program on or
before December 1 of each year that includes:
(A) general program Program statistics, including a list of programs
by county;
(B) an analysis of apprentices in the program Program disaggregated
by age, race, sex, gender identity, New American status language access needs,
Veteran status, disability, industry, and education status, including
participation in career and technical education;
(C) nontraditional occupations by gender and race;
(D) new occupations approved;
(E) an analysis of the average starting and ending wage by
occupation;
(F) new sponsors, employers, or industries involved with programs
over the previous period;
(G) a summary of how allocated funds were used and analysis of the
impact of those funds, including uses of any federal funds awarded during the
year; and
(H) a summary of significant activities of the program Program.
§ 1114. VERMONT APPRENTICESHIP ADVISORY BOARD
* * *
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 5 of 10
(c) Duties. The Board shall:
* * *
(6) Create and convene working groups that are tasked with specific
activities related to improving the quality, safety, diversity, and alignment of
apprenticeship programs. Working group membership is not limited to
appointed members of the Board and shall be selected and serve at the
discretion of the Chair.
(7) Ensure that the registered apprenticeship program addresses barriers
to participation and completion of the program, including underserved
populations.
(8) Strengthen relationships with community partners that serve:
(A) underserved populations and historically marginalized
communities that have not previously accessed apprenticeship programs; and
(B) individuals who face systemic barriers to participation in the
program as evidenced by a disproportionate lack of participation in
apprenticeship programs.
* * *
§ 1119. APPRENTICES REGISTERED; AGREEMENT
* * *
(c) An apprenticeship agreement shall contain:
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 6 of 10
(1) the names and signatures of the apprentice, of the program sponsor
or employer, and of a parent or guardian of the apprentice if the apprentice is a
minor;
(2) the date of birth and Social Security number of the apprentice;
(3) the contact information of the program sponsor and the Vermont
Registered Apprenticeship Program;
(4) a statement of the occupation in which the apprentice is to be trained
and the beginning date and duration of apprenticeship;
* * *
(12) to conform to the federal Equal Employment Opportunity Act of
1972, 42 U.S.C. chapter 21, subchapter VI and for affirmative action
compliance in apprenticeship programs, and for compliance with reporting and
analysis of the Vermont Registered Apprenticeship Program, the voluntary
disclosure of the apprentice’s race, color, national origin, place of birth, sex,
gender, gender identity, primary language spoken, age, veteran status, sexual
orientation, ethnicity, and disability status; and
(13) if the apprentice completed secondary school in Vermont and is
between 18 and 25 years of age, the name of the secondary school from which
the apprentice is a graduate, and if the apprentice attended a regional CTE
center, the name of the center where the apprentice received technical
education while in secondary school;
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 7 of 10
(14) a statement that the apprentice will be accorded equal opportunity
in all phases of apprenticeship employment and training, without
discrimination because of race, color, national origin, place of birth, sex,
gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, primary language spoken,
genetic information, veteran status, and disability status; and
(15) optional fields for:
(A) the social security number of the apprentice; and
(B) demographic characteristics of the apprentice.
(d) An apprenticeship agreement shall not be modified unless it is in
writing and signed by the parties.
* * *
§ 1123. PRE-APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
* * *
(b) A pre-apprenticeship program may be registered certified by the
Department after successfully demonstrating:
* * *
§ 1124. YOUTH APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
(a) A youth apprenticeship program is one that prepares a youth apprentice
for acceptance into an apprenticeship program and is designed for youth
apprentices who start the program while still enrolled in high school:
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 8 of 10
(1) have not completed secondary education;
(2) are in an educational program approved by the Agency of Education;
and
(3) are enrolled in a career technical education program.
(b) A youth apprenticeship program may be registered by the Department
after submitting a regional CTE center submits the following information:
(1) a written plan that articulates the work processes and how a youth
apprentice will receive supervised work experience and on-the-job training or
training in an experiential setting;
(2) how time spent by a youth apprentice in each major work process
will be spent or that specifies how competencies or proficiencies are aligned
between their high school education and the youth apprenticeship program, and
that states which graduation requirements will be met;
(3) a description of the mentoring that will be provided to the youth
apprentice;
(4) a description or timeline explaining the periodic reviews and
evaluations of the youth apprentices performance on the job and in related
technical instruction;
(5) a process for maintaining appropriate progress records, including the
reviews and evaluations;
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 9 of 10
(6) a description of related classroom-based instruction, which may be
fulfilled through dual or concurrent enrollment in secondary or post-secondary
courses;
(7) whether and how the program is aligned with high school diploma
requirements and career clusters;
(8) whether the program meets the related technical instruction
requirements for an apprenticeship program;
(9) if a program includes paid work during or outside the school year
and outside the school day, a progressively increasing, clearly defined schedule
of wages to be paid to the youth apprentice as skills are mastered;
(10) how the program prepares the youth apprentice for placement in
further education, employment, or an a registered apprenticeship program; and
(11) the terms by which the program grants advanced standing or credit
to individuals applying for the youth apprenticeship with demonstrated
competency or acquired experience, training, or skills a statement of advanced
standing that specifies the advanced standing requirements by which
participating employers in the program will grant credit to students who are
interested in transferring to full apprenticeship registration upon completion of
the youth apprenticeship program;
(12) an accounting of costs for the program covered by the participating
partners, grants, or other sources of funds; and
VT LEG #386649 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.803
2026 Page 10 of 10
(13) an assurance that school staff, employer partners, and others
involved in the program are aware of youth legal protections regarding child
labor, wage payment, youth apprenticeship, and other applicable laws and
regulations.
(c) An apprenticeship plan submitted in conformity with subsection (b) of
this section shall be developed in partnership with apprenticeship sponsors for
specific occupational areas and sending high schools.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386649 v.1